Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 68.50.010 and 2021 c 127 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:The jurisdiction of bodies of all deceased persons who come to their death suddenly when in apparent good health without medical attendance within the ((thirty-six))36 hours preceding death; or where the circumstances of death indicate death was caused by unnatural or unlawful means; or where death occurs under suspicious circumstances; or where a coroner's autopsy or postmortem or coroner's inquest is to be held; or where death results from unknown or obscure causes, or where death occurs within one year following an accident; or where the death is caused by any violence whatsoever, ((or where death results from a known or suspected abortion;)) whether self-induced or otherwise; where death apparently results from drowning, hanging, burns, electrocution, gunshot wounds, stabs or cuts, lightning, starvation, radiation, exposure, alcoholism, narcotics or other addictions, tetanus, strangulations, suffocation or smothering; ((or where death is due to premature birth or still birth;)) or where death is due to a violent contagious disease or suspected contagious disease which may be a public health hazard; or where death results from alleged rape, carnal knowledge or sodomy, where death occurs in a jail or prison; where a body is found dead or is not claimed by relatives or friends, is hereby vested in the county coroner or medical examiner, which bodies may be removed and placed in the morgue under such rules as are adopted by the coroner or medical examiner with the approval of the county commissioners, having jurisdiction, providing therein how the bodies shall be brought to and cared for at the morgue and held for the proper identification where necessary.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 9.02 RCW to read as follows:(1) Detention facilities and private detention facilities shall report annually to the department of health on the number of people who experience miscarriage, stillbirth, or perinatal loss while confined or incarcerated in such facilities.(2) The department of health shall deliver an annual statewide report to the legislature that details the number of people who experience miscarriage, stillbirth, or perinatal loss while confined or incarcerated in detention facilities and private detention facilities. The first report shall be delivered by December 1, 2026. The report may not include personal identifying information concerning the individuals who experience miscarriage, stillbirth, or perinatal loss.(3) For purposes of this section, "detention facilities" and "private detention facilities" have the same meanings as defined in RCW 70.395.020.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 9.02.050 (Concealing birth) and 1909 c 249 s 200 are each repealed.--- END ---